Maryland, session 2025, HB1253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 1–309.1 of Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be transferred to be Section(s) 9–4108 of Article – State Government of
the Annotated Code of Maryland.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 1–309.2 of Article
– Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to
be Section(s) 1–309.1.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 9–301 through
9–303, 9–303.1, 9–303.2, 9–303.3, 9–304, 9–304.1, and 9–305 through 9–308 and the
subtitle “Subtitle 3. Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs” of Article –
State Government of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s)
9–4111 through 9–4122, respectively, and the part “Part III. Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs”.
SECTION 1. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
OF MARYLAND, That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–1401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
(e) “Program” means the Capital Access Program established under this subtitle.
36–1406.
(d) The Department shall collaborate with the Office of Social Equity established
under [§ 1–309.1 of this article] § 9–4108 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE to
identify and assist businesses with obtaining financing from the Program.
– 3 –

Ch. 605 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC
MOBILITY SPECIAL FUND.
14–305.
(b) (1) On or before December 31 of each year, the Governor’s Office of Small,
Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall submit to the Board of Public Works and,
subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Legislative Policy Committee
and the Joint Committee on Fair Practices and State Personnel Oversight a report
summarizing the information the Office receives under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) If applicable, the report submitted under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall include minority business enterprise participation data for each unit by
industry type.
(3) This report may be prepared in conjunction with the annual report
required under [§ 9–306] § 9–4120 of the State Government Article.
(4) (i) Beginning with the report submitted under paragraph (1) of this
subsection on December 31, 2023, and each year thereafter, the Governor’s Office of Small,
Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall include in the report an attestation that all
units required to report under subsection (a) of this section are represented in the report.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
(ii) To ensure accuracy of the attestation made under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph, on or before December 31, 2023, and every 3 years thereafter, the
Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall conduct an audit
of the Executive Branch of State government to determine what entities are included in the
definition of “unit” under § 11–101 of this article.
Article – State Government
8–201.
(a) The Executive Branch of the State government shall have not more than [21]
22 principal departments, each of which shall embrace a broad, functional area of that
Branch.
(b) The principal departments of the Executive Branch of the State government
are:
(1) Aging;
(2) Agriculture;
(3) Budget and Management;
(4) Commerce;
(5) Disabilities;
(6) Emergency Management;
(7) the Environment;
(8) General Services;
(9) Health;
(10) Housing and Community Development;
(11) Human Services;
(12) Information Technology;
(13) Juvenile Services;
(14) Labor;
(15) Natural Resources;
– 5 –

Ch. 605 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(16) Planning;
(17) Public Safety and Correctional Services;
(18) Service and Civic Innovation;
(19) SOCIAL EQUITY AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY;
(20) State Police;
[(20)] (21) Transportation; and
[(21)] (22) Veterans and Military Families.
SUBTITLE 41. MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL EQUITY AND ECONOMIC
MOBILITY.
PART I. DEFINITIONS.
9–4101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL
EQUITY AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY.
(C) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF SOCIAL EQUITY AND
ECONOMIC MOBILITY.
(D) “UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT” OR “UNIT” MEANS AN AGENCY OR UNIT
OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
9–4101.1. RESERVED.
9–4101.2. RESERVED.
PART II. GENERAL PROVISIONS.
9–4102.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL EQUITY AND
ECONOMIC MOBILITY, ESTABLISHED AS A PRINCIPAL DEPARTMENT OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT.
(B) (1) THE HEAD OF THE DEPARTMENT IS THE SECRETARY OF SOCIAL
EQUITY AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY, WHO SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR
WITH THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE.
(2) THE SECRETARY SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF THE GOVERNOR.
(C) THE FOLLOWING UNITS ARE IN THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) THE OFFICE OF MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES;
(2) THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS
AFFAIRS; AND
(3) THE OFFICE OF SOCIAL EQUITY.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EMPLOY STAFF TO CARRY OUT ITS DUTIES AS
PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
9–4103.
(A) THE PURPOSE OF THE DEPARTMENT IS TO:
(1) PROVIDE SUPPORT FOR UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT,
INDIVIDUALS, AND BUSINESSES FOR THE MAINTENANCE OF SOCIAL EQUITY
POLICIES IN THE STATE;
(2) MONITOR TRENDS IN SOCIAL EQUITY PROGRAMS AND POLICIES
ACROSS THE NATION;
(3) PROPOSE NEW AND INNOVATIVE APPROACHES TO SOCIAL EQUITY
PROGRAMS;
(4) COMPILE AND PRODUCE REPORTS AND RECOMMENDATIONS
RELATED TO SOCIAL EQUITY; AND
(5) ENSURE THE FULFILLMENT OF THE ROLES AND
RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE ENTITIES AND SOCIAL EQUITY PROGRAMS IN THE STATE
FOR WHICH IT IS THE SUCCESSOR;
– 7 –

Ch. 605 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) TRACK THE PERFORMANCE OF SOCIAL EQUITY PROGRAMS AND
SMALL OR DISADVANTAGED BUSINESS ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS;
(7) PROMOTE AND ENCOURAGE FULL PARTICIPATION IN THE
REGULATED CANNABIS INDUSTRY BY INDIVIDUALS FROM COMMUNITIES THAT HAVE
PREVIOUSLY BEEN DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED BY THE WAR ON DRUGS IN
ORDER TO POSITIVELY IMPACT THOSE COMMUNITIES AND OTHER DUTIES ASSIGNED
TO THE OFFICE OF SOCIAL EQUITY ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(8) SUPPORT SMALL OR DISADVANTAGED BUSINESSES IN THE STATE
THROUGH ALL DUTIES ASSIGNED TO THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS; AND
(9) CARRY OUT THE DUTIES OF THE OFFICE OF MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES WITHIN THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION,
INCLUDING DUTIES ASSIGNED TO SUPPORT SMALL OR DISADVANTAGED
BUSINESSES.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) CONNECT A PERSON WITH PROGRAMS IN STATE, FEDERAL, AND
LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT SERVE DESIGNATED POPULATIONS TO ENSURE THE
PERSON IS CONNECTED TO PROGRAMS AND OTHER OPPORTUNITIES THE PERSON IS
ELIGIBLE FOR;
(2) PROVIDE UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT WITH ASSISTANCE
RELATED TO THE PURPOSE OF THE DEPARTMENT BY:
(I) FACILITATING INFORMATION SHARING BETWEEN UNITS;
(II) MAINTAINING AN INVENTORY OF SOCIAL EQUITY WORK
PERFORMED BY EACH UNIT AND RELEVANT REPORTS FROM THOSE UNITS;
(III) CONDUCTING POLICY ANALYSES ON SOCIAL EQUITY AND
THE EFFECTIVENESS OF SOCIAL EQUITY PROGRAMS;
(IV) ADOPTING STANDARDS FOR UNITS TO PROMOTE SOCIAL
EQUITY; AND
(V) PROVIDING TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO UNITS; AND
(3) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
9–4104.
A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT OTHER THAN THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ENSURE THAT A PERSON THAT INTERACTS WITH THE UNIT’S
PROGRAM FOR DESIGNATED POPULATIONS IS CONNECTED WITH ALL STATE
PROGRAMS FOR WHICH THE PERSON MAY BE ELIGIBLE BY REFERRING THE PERSON
TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) UTILIZE STANDARDS SET BY THE DEPARTMENT RELATED TO
SOCIAL EQUITY.
9–4105.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE WORK OF THE DEPARTMENT IN THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING YEAR; AND
(2) RECOMMENDED CHANGES TO LAWS OR POLICIES TO PROMOTE
SOCIAL EQUITY.
9–4106.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS LEGAL ADVISER TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ASSIGN TO THE DEPARTMENT THE
NUMBER OF ASSISTANT ATTORNEYS GENERAL AUTHORIZED BY LAW TO BE ASSIGNED
TO THE DEPARTMENT AND ANY ADDITIONAL ASSISTANT ATTORNEYS GENERAL
NECESSARY TO GIVE EFFECTIVE LEGAL ADVICE AND COUNSEL.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ALSO SHALL DESIGNATE AN ASSISTANT
ATTORNEY GENERAL AS COUNSEL TO THE DEPARTMENT.
9–4107.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
ECONOMIC MOBILITY SPECIAL FUND.
(B) THERE IS A DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY
SPECIAL FUND.
– 9 –

Ch. 605 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PAY THE COSTS OF THE OPERATION
OF:
(1) THE OFFICE OF SOCIAL EQUITY; AND
(2) THE OFFICE OF MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) (1) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–1302.2 OF
THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(II) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND;
(III) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(2) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL
AN APPROPRIATION FROM THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND TO THE FUND
EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO DEFRAY THE OPERATIONS AND
ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE OF MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR PAYING THE COSTS OF THE
OPERATION AND ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF:
(1) THE OFFICE OF SOCIAL EQUITY; AND
(2) THE OFFICE OF MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR THE OFFICE OF SOCIAL
EQUITY OR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES IS SUPPLEMENTAL
TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE
WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE OFFICE OF SOCIAL EQUITY OR THE OFFICE OF
MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES.
9–4108.
(a) [(1)] There is an Office of Social Equity[.
(2) The Office is an independent office that functions] within the
[Maryland Cannabis Administration] DEPARTMENT.
(b) (1) The Governor shall appoint an Executive Director of the Office of Social
Equity.
(2) The Executive Director of the Office of Social Equity shall have at least
5 years of experience in civil rights advocacy, civil rights litigation, or another area of social
justice.
(c) The Office of Social Equity may employ staff and retain contractors as may be
required to carry out the functions of the Office.
(d) The Office of Social Equity shall:
(1) promote and encourage full participation in the regulated cannabis
industry by people from communities that have previously been disproportionately
impacted by the war on drugs in order to positively impact those communities;
(2) consult with and assist the Comptroller in the administration of the
Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund under § 1–322 of [this subtitle] THE
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE;
(3) consult with and assist the Department of Commerce in the
administration of the Cannabis Business Assistance Fund under § 5–1901 of the Economic
Development Article;
– 11 –

Ch. 605 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) identify and oppose regulations that unnecessarily burden or
undermine the legislative intent of the Office, including regulations that impose undue
restrictions or financial requirements;
(5) provide recommendations to the Maryland Cannabis Administration on
regulations related to:
(i) diversity; and
(ii) social equity applications;
(6) work with the Maryland Cannabis Administration to implement free
technical assistance for social equity and minority cannabis business applicants;
(7) produce reports and recommendations on diversity and equity in
ownership, management, and employment in the legal cannabis economy; and
(8) assist businesses with obtaining financing through the Capital Access
Program under Title 36, Subtitle 14 of [this article] THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND
CANNABIS ARTICLE.
(e) (1) On or before March 1 each year, the Office of Social Equity shall produce
and make publicly available a report on how the funds in the Community Reinvestment
and Repair Fund under § 1–322 of [this subtitle] THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND
CANNABIS ARTICLE were allocated during the immediately preceding calendar year.
(2) The report shall also be submitted to the General Assembly in
accordance with § 2–1257 of [the State Government Article] THIS ARTICLE.
(3) The Office may request information from political subdivisions and
entities receiving distributions from the Fund to assist with the completion of the report.
(f) (1) On or before November 1 every 2 years, beginning in 2024, the Office of
Social Equity shall solicit public input on the uses of the funds in the Community
Reinvestment and Repair Fund under § 1–322 of [this subtitle] THE ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
(2) On or before December 15 every 2 years, beginning in 2024, the Office
of Social Equity shall publish a review of the input received under paragraph (1) of this
subsection on a publicly accessible part of the Office’s website.
(3) The Office shall include in the review information on how the funds
received from the Fund were spent during the immediately preceding 2 calendar years.
9–4109. RESERVED.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
9–4110. RESERVED.
Part III. Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
9–4111.
(a) In this [subtitle] PART the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Interdepartmental Committee” means the Interdepartmental Advisory
Committee on Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
(c) (1) “Minority person” means:
(i) an individual who has been deprived of the opportunity to
develop and keep a competitive position in the economy because of a social or economic
disadvantage that arises from cultural, racial, or other similar causes; or
(ii) a sheltered workshop for individuals with disabilities.
(2) “Minority person” includes:
(i) an Aleut;
(ii) an American Indian;
(iii) a Black;
(iv) an Eskimo;
(v) a Hispanic;
(vi) an Oriental;
(vii) a Puerto Rican; or
(viii) a woman.
(d) “Office” means the Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
(e) “Special Secretary” means the Special Secretary for the Office of Small,
Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
9–4112.
– 13 –

Ch. 605 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
There is an Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs in the [Executive]
Department.
9–4114.
(a) There is an Interdepartmental Advisory Committee on Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs.
(b) The Interdepartmental Committee is composed of:
(1) the secretary of each principal department of the Executive Branch of
government, or the secretary’s designee;
(2) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the Superintendent’s designee;
(3) the Secretary of Higher Education, or the Secretary’s designee; and
(4) the Special Secretary.
(c) The Interdepartmental Committee shall:
(1) advise the Special Secretary on proposals to implement and enhance
the duties of the Office, including the promotion of employment of minority persons in the
State, and the promotion of the growth and participation of minority business enterprises
in the State;
(2) gather such information the Committee deems necessary to promote
the goals of the Office;
(3) provide such other assistance as may be required to further the
purposes of [§§ 9–304 and 9–305] §§ 9–4117 AND 9–4119 of this subtitle; and
(4) meet at the call of the Special Secretary.
Article – Tax – General
2–1302.2.
After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through 2–1302.1 of this
subtitle, of the sales and use tax collected under § 11–104(k) of this article from the sale of
cannabis, as defined in § 1–101 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, the
Comptroller quarterly shall distribute:
(1) to the Cannabis Regulation and Enforcement Fund, established under
§ 36–206 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, an amount necessary to defray
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
the entire cost of the operations and administrative expenses of the Maryland Cannabis
Administration established under Title 36 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(2) TO THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY
SPECIAL FUND, ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–4107 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, AN AMOUNT NECESSARY TO DEFRAY THE OPERATIONS AND
ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE OF SOCIAL EQUITY WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY;
(3) after making the distribution required under [item (1)] ITEMS (1) AND
(2) of this section:
(i) 35% to the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund under §
1–322 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article for fiscal years 2024 through 2033;
(ii) 5% to counties, which shall be allocated to each county based on
the percentage of revenue collected from that county, except that a county shall distribute
to a municipality located in the county 50% of the allocation received under this item that
is attributable to the sales and use tax revenue generated by a dispensary located in that
municipality;
(iii) 5% to the Cannabis Public Health Fund established under §
13–4505 of the Health – General Article; and
(iv) for fiscal years 2024 through 2028, 5% to the Cannabis Business
Assistance Fund established under § 5–1901 of the Economic Development Article; and
[(3)] (4) any balance remaining after the distributions required under
items (1) [and], (2), AND (3) of this section to the General Fund of the State.
SECTION 2. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In regard to the operation of social equity programs by the State, the Maryland
Department of Social Equity and Economic Mobility is the successor of:
(1) the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women–Owned Women
Business Affairs;
(2) the Office of Social Equity in the Maryland Cannabis Administration;
and
(3) the Office of Minority Business Enterprises in the Maryland
Department of Transportation.
(b) When determining how and when to transfer personnel from the Governor’s
Office of Small, Minority, and Women–Owned Women Business Affairs, the Office of Social
– 15 –

Ch. 605 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Equity in the Maryland Cannabis Administration, and the Office of Minority Business
Enterprises in the Maryland Department of Transportation to the Maryland Department
of Social Equity, the Governor and the Department of Budget and Management shall
minimize costs to the State and maximize the efficient operation of social equity programs.
(c) In every law, executive order, rule, regulation, policy, or document created by
an official, an employee, or a unit of this State, the names and titles of those agencies and
officials mean the names and titles of the successor agency or official for matters regarding
the operation of social equity programs by the State.
SECTION 3. 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, as of the effective date of
this Act, an individual who is a merit employee or contract staff in a budgeted position of
the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women–Owned Women Business Affairs, the
Office of Social Equity in the Maryland Cannabis Administration, or the Office of Minority
Business Enterprises in the Maryland Department of Transportation and whose position
is transferred to the Maryland Department of Social Equity and Economic Mobility to
oversee the regulation of cannabis shall be transferred without any change to, or loss of,
the individual’s rights, pay, working conditions, benefits, or status, and shall retain the
individual’s merit system status and retirement system status.
SECTION 4. 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the Governor may transfer to the Maryland Department of Social Equity
and Economic Mobility positions, associated funds, and unexpended appropriations under
applicable budget codes that were included in the fiscal year 2026 State budget as enacted
by Chapter ____ (S.B. 319) (H.B. 350) of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025.
SECTION 5. 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2026,
the Maryland Department of Social Equity and Economic Mobility shall submit a report to
the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly that:
(1) identifies all State programs and units dedicated to social equity or that
have a social equity component; and
(2) makes recommendations regarding how State programs and units can
be reorganized, coordinated, or otherwise made more effective and more efficient to promote
social equity.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 605
SECTION 6. 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 17 –